Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Issue — Issuer.

Sec. 45.08.201.
“Issuer”.

With respect to obligations on or defenses to a security, “issuer” includes a person who

places or authorizes the placing of the person’s name on a security certificate, other than as authenticating trustee, registrar, transfer agent, or the like, to evidence a share, participation, or other interest in the person’s property or in an enterprise, or to evidence the person’s duty to perform an obligation represented by the certificate;

creates shares, participations, or other interests in that person’s property or in an enterprise, or undertakes obligations, if the shares, participations, interests, or obligations are uncertificated securities;

directly or indirectly creates fractional interests in the person’s rights or property, if the fractional interests are represented by security certificates; or

becomes responsible for, or in place of, another person described as an issuer in this section.

With respect to obligations on or defenses to a security, a guarantor is an issuer to the extent of the guarantor’s guarantee, whether or not the guarantor’s obligation is noted on a security certificate.

With respect to registration of a transfer, “issuer” means a person on whose behalf transfer books are maintained.

History.

(§ 8.201 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 12 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.202.
Issuer’s responsibility and defenses; notice of defect or defense.

Even against a purchaser for value and without notice, the terms of a certificated security include terms stated on the certificate and terms made part of the security by reference on the certificate to another instrument, indenture, or document or to a constitution, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, or the like, to the extent the terms referred to do not conflict with terms stated on the certificate. A reference under this subsection does not of itself charge a purchaser for value with notice of a defect going to the validity of the security, even if the certificate expressly states that a person accepting it admits notice. The terms of an uncertificated security include those stated in an instrument, indenture, or document or in a constitution, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, or the like, under which the security is issued.

The following rules apply if an issuer asserts that a security is not valid:

a security other than one issued by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, even though issued with a defect going to its validity, is valid in the hands of a purchaser for value and without notice of the particular defect unless the defect involves a violation of a constitutional provision; in that case, the security is valid in the hands of a purchaser for value and without notice of the defect, other than one who takes by original issue;

paragraph (1) of this subsection applies to an issuer that is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality only if there has been substantial compliance with the legal requirements governing the issue or the issuer has received a substantial consideration for the issue as a whole or for the particular security and a stated purpose of the issue is one for which the issuer has power to borrow money or issue the security.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.08.205

, lack of genuineness of a certificated security is a complete defense, even against a purchaser for value and without notice.

All other defenses of the issuer of a security, including nondelivery and conditional delivery of a certificated security, are ineffective against a purchaser for value who has taken the certificated security without notice of the particular defense.

This section does not affect the right of a party to cancel a contract for a security “when, as, and if issued” or a “when distributed” in the event of a material change in the character of the security that is the subject of the contract or in the plan or arrangement under which the security is to be issued or distributed.

If a security is held by a securities intermediary against whom an entitlement holder has a security entitlement with respect to the security, the issuer may not assert a defense that the issuer could not assert if the entitlement holder held the security directly.

History.

(§ 8.202 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 9 ch 16 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 14 — 19 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.203.
Staleness as notice of defects or defenses.

After an act or event, other than a call that has been revoked, creating a right to immediate performance of the principal obligation represented by a certificated security or setting a date on or after which the security is to be presented or surrendered for redemption or exchange, a purchaser is charged with notice of any defect in the security’s issue or defense of the issuer, if the act or event

requires the payment of money, the delivery of certificated securities, the registration of transfer of uncertificated securities, or any of these on presentation or surrender of the security certificate, the money or securities are available on the date set for payment or exchange, and the purchaser takes the security more than one year after that date; or

is not covered by (1) of this subsection and the purchaser takes the security more than two years after the date set for surrender or presentation or the date on which performance became due.

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 8.203 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 14 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 20, 68 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.204.
Effect of issuer’s restriction on transfer.

A restriction on transfer of a security imposed by the issuer, even though otherwise lawful, is ineffective against a person without knowledge of the restriction unless the security

is certificated and the restriction is noted conspicuously on the security certificate; or

is uncertificated and the registered owner has been notified of the restriction.

History.

(§ 8.204 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 15 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 21 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.205.
Effect of unauthorized signature on security certificate.

An unauthorized signature placed on a security certificate before or in the course of issue is ineffective, but the signature is effective in favor of a purchaser for value of the certificated security if the purchaser is without notice of the lack of authority and the signing has been done by

an authenticating trustee, registrar, transfer agent, or other person entrusted by the issuer with the signing of the security certificate or of similar security certificates, or the immediate preparation for signing of any of them; or

an employee of the issuer, or of a person listed in (1) of this section, entrusted with responsible handling of the security certificate.

History.

(§ 8.205 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 16 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 22 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.206.
Completion or alteration of certificated security.

If a security certificate contains the signatures necessary to its issue or transfer but is incomplete in another respect,

a person may complete it by filling in the blanks as authorized; and

even if the blanks are incorrectly filled in, the security certificate as completed is enforceable by a purchaser who takes it for value and without notice of the incorrectness.

A complete security certificate that has been improperly altered, even if fraudulently, remains enforceable, but only according to its original terms.

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 8.206 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 17, 18 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 23, 24, 68 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.207.
Rights and duties of issuer with respect to registered owners and registered pledgees.

Before due presentment for registration of transfer of a certificated security in registered form or of an instruction requesting registration of transfer of an uncertificated security, the issuer or indenture trustee may treat the registered owner as the person exclusively entitled to vote, to receive notifications, and otherwise to exercise all the rights and powers of an owner.

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

This chapter does not affect the liability of the registered owner of a security for calls, assessments, or the like.

History.

(§ 8.207 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 19 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 25, 26, 68 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of UCC § 8-207(1) allowing issuer of investment security to treat registered owner as entitled to owner’s rights until presentment for registration of transfer, 21 ALR4th 879.

Sec. 45.08.208.
Effect of signature of authenticating trustee, registrar, or transfer agent.

A person signing a security certificate as authenticating trustee, registrar, transfer agent, or the like, warrants to a purchaser for value of the certificated security, if the purchaser is without notice of the particular defect, that

the certificate is genuine;

the person’s own participation in the issue of the security is within the person’s capacity and within the scope of the authority received by the person from the issuer; and

the person has reasonable grounds to believe that the certificated security is in the form and within the amount the issuer is authorized to issue.

Unless otherwise agreed, a person signing under (a) of this section does not assume responsibility for the validity of the security in other respects.

History.

(§ 8.208 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 10, 11 ch 16 SLA 1982; am § 20 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 27 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.209.
Issuer’s lien.

A lien in favor of an issuer upon a certificated security is valid against a purchaser only if the right of the issuer to the lien is noted conspicuously on the security certificate.

History.

(§ 28 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.210.
Overissue.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this section, the provisions of AS

45.08.201

—

45.08.210

that validate a security or compel its issue or reissue do not apply to the extent that validation, issue, or reissue would result in overissue.

If an identical security not constituting an overissue is reasonably available for purchase, a person entitled to issue or validation may compel the issuer to purchase the security and deliver it if certificated or register its transfer if uncertificated, against surrender of any security certificate the person holds.

If a security is not reasonably available for purchase, a person entitled to issue or validation may recover from the issuer the price the person or the last purchaser for value paid for it with interest from the date of the person’s demand.

In this section, “overissue” means the issue of securities in excess of the amount the issuer has corporate power to issue, but an overissue does not occur if appropriate action has cured the overissue.

History.

(§ 28 ch 17 SLA 1996)